Utah statutes.
62A-4a-601.   Definitions.

For purposes of this part:

(1)  "Child placing" means:

(a)  receiving, accepting, or providing custody or care for a child, temporarily or permanently, for the purpose of finding a person to adopt the child; or

(b)  placing a child, temporarily or permanently, in a home for adoption or substitute care.

(2)  "Child placing agency" means an individual, agency, firm, corporation, association, or group children's home that engages in child placing.



Amended by Chapter 281, 2006 General Session

